California statutes. Water Code
The person in custody of any special account shall make a verified report in writing to the board between the first and tenth of each month showing all of the following for the month next preceding:

(a) Amount of money received by him for the account in his charge.

(b) Amount and items of expenditures from the account.

The report shall be filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24393.

No payment shall be made from any special account except upon the written order of a person designated for the purpose by the board, which order shall indicate the purpose for which and the person to whom payment is to be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Funds [24475. - 24530.]



  ARTICLE 1. Funds Generally [24475. - 24486.]

24475.

The following funds are created to which district money properly belonging shall be apportioned:

(a) Bond principal fund.

(b) Bond interest fund.

(c) Construction fund.

(d) General fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24476.

A district may provide for a reserve fund to be used for the payment of the interest or principal of any outstanding bonds. If the estimate referred to in Section 24955 and the order determining the amount of bonds provided for in Section 24962, provide for a revenue bond reserve fund in a specified amount to be set aside out of the proceeds of sale of revenue bonds, then the district may, upon the sale of any bonds payable solely from revenues, create such revenue bond reserve fund and set aside in such fund out of the proceeds of sale of such bonds a sum not exceeding such specified amount, such fund to be maintained from revenues and used and withdrawn solely for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on such bonds in the event that no other funds are available therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 298.)
-------------------------------------------

24477.

A district may establish any fund required to comply with the terms of any plan by which any bonds are to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24478.

To the extent that any fund contains money applicable to a sinking fund provided for in a refunding plan or modification of it, the treasurer shall withdraw the sinking fund money from the fund to the amount and at the times required by the terms of the refunding plan or modification of it and apply the money pursuant to those terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24479.

Surplus funds on hand and available for payment into a refunding bond sinking fund may on order of the board be paid into it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24480.

Any money in a refunding bond sinking fund may be invested in bonds of the United States or of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24481.

Federal and State bonds so purchased with the sinking fund money together with the income from them shall be held as part of the sinking fund until the board determines that it is for the best interests of the district that the bonds or any of them be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24482.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds in which any part of the sinking fund was invested shall be deposited in the sinking fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24483.

The proceeds of the annual assessment shall be paid into the district treasury and be apportioned to the several proper funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24484.

The proceeds of limited assessments shall be paid into the district treasury for the purpose for which the assessments were respectively authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24485.

The proceeds from the lease or sale of any property specifically allocated to the payment of warrants shall be placed in a separate fund and shall not be diverted to any other purpose until the warrants are paid in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24486.

Whenever an object for which money has been specifically provided by district assessment or by bond issue has been accomplished and any money provided therefor remains unexpended, it may be transferred by the board to the general fund and thereafter be available for any district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Payment and Purchase of Bonds [24500. - 24507.]

24500.

Upon presentation of any matured bond of the district, the treasurer shall pay it from the bond principal fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24501.

Upon presentation of any matured interest coupon of any bond of the district, the treasurer shall pay it from the bond interest fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24503.

If the principal or interest of any bonds is payable from any special or sinking fund, it shall be payable from that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24504.

If money is not available in the fund designated for the payment of any matured bond or interest coupon, it shall draw interest at the annual adjusted rate established by the Franchise Tax Board, as provided in Section 19269 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, from the date of its presentation for payment until notice is given that funds are available for its payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 771, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

24504.1.

In the case of any district described in Section 20560.1 with respect to construction bonds issued for purposes of financing the works described in that section, if money is not available in the fund designated for the payment of any matured bond or interest coupon of the district payable solely from revenues, it shall draw interest at the rate borne by the bond or interest coupon from the date of its presentation for payment until notice is given that funds are available for its payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 871, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

24505.

A bond presented but not paid shall be stamped and provision made for its payment as in the case of a warrant payable on demand for the payment of which funds are not available on its presentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24506.

Whenever there is in any fund of the district money in excess of that required for the purposes of the fund up to the time when any part of the next annual assessment levied or to be levied in the district will become delinquent, the district may purchase with this surplus money or any part of it any of its outstanding bonds not yet due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24507.

Bonds so purchased may be canceled or held as a part of the district assets until the board determines that it is for the best interests of the district that the bonds or any of them be sold. Bonds not resold prior to the date of their maturity shall be canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Distribution District Funds [24510. - 24513.]

24510.

Payments on behalf of a distribution district shall be made only out of the proceeds and charges for the use of water or other service levied or fixed and collected for the purpose of meeting the requirements of a contract between the distribution district and the United States executed under the federal reclamation laws, and for repayment to the district for expenses necessarily incurred by it in connection with the formation of the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

24511.

Distribution district warrants shall be used solely for making payments which may be required to carry out the requirements of a contract between a distribution district and the United States, executed under the provisions of the federal reclamation laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

24512.

If the proceeds from any distribution district assessment or charge exceed the amounts necessary for the purpose for which they were levied, the excess may either be held in a proper fund to be used for the operation of the distribution district or be transferred to the general fund of the district to be used as the board deems proper for the benefit of the land in the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

24513.

Receipts from assessments levied and charges fixed in connection with distribution districts shall be deposited in a separate fund for the benefit of the distribution district to be used for meeting any payments which may be required in carrying out the requirements of a contract between a distribution district and the United States, executed under the provisions of the federal reclamation laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Improvement District Funds [24525. - 24530.]

24525.

The cost of improvement district improvements shall be paid only out of the proceeds of an improvement district assessment levied upon and collected from the land in the improvement district for improvement purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24526.

Improvement district warrants shall be paid only out of the proceeds of an improvement district assessment levied upon and collected from the land within the improvement district for improvement purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24527.

Improvement district warrants or their proceeds shall be used solely for making the improvements for which the improvement district was formed and the necessary incidental expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24528.

The cost of the improvement for an improvement district may be paid immediately from either the general fund of the district or from any special or construction fund available, the money advanced to be returned to the fund from which taken upon the collection of assessments for the improvement district or sale of improvement district warrants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

24529.

If the proceeds from any improvement district assessment levied for improvement purposes exceeds the final amount necessary for the purposes for which it was levied, the excess may be held in a special fund to be used for the operation of the works of the improvement district, be transferred to the general fund of the district to be used as the board deems proper for the benefit of the land in the improvement district, or be distributed to the holders of title to land in the improvement district in the proportion that the respective parcels of land contributed to the total collected from the improvement district assessment, the holders of title to be conclusively determined by the district assessment book last equalized at the time the distribution is made, with unknown and fictitiously named owners being disregarded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

24530.

Receipts from assessments levied for the operation of improvement districts and charges in lieu of the assessments, when collected, shall be deposited in a separate fund for the benefit of the improvement district to be used for its operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Warrants [24600. - 24675.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Payment of Claims [24600. - 24604.]

24600.

No claim shall be paid by the treasurer until allowed by the board, and only upon a warrant signed by the president and countersigned by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24601.

All claims against any district presented by any officer or employee for mileage, personal expenses, or for money expended by the claimant for the district shall be filed with the board upon a form furnished by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24602.

Claims set forth in Section 24601 shall be itemized in detail to show:

(a) Date of each expenditure.

(b) Place where the expenditure was made.

(c) Purpose for which any money claimed was expended.

(d) Miles traveled and purposes of trips for which mileage is claimed.

(e) Any other matters the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24603.

The officer or employee presenting any claim provided for in Section 24601 shall verify it before the secretary, who is authorized to administer oaths for that purpose, or before any person authorized by law to administer oaths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24604.

The verification shall state in substance all of the following:

(a) The money claimed was actually expended or the mileage stated was actually traveled for the district in pursuance of the duties of the officer or employee presenting the claim.

(b) The claim is presented in good faith and has not been previously paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Warrants Payable at Future Times [24625. - 24636.]

24625.

If any contract or lease for the acquisition of property provides for any future payments by the district, warrants may be issued, on order of the board, for the payments, which warrants shall be made payable at the times provided in the contract or lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24626.

When a particular purpose or emergency assessment has been authorized, warrants in an amount equal to the amount of the assessment may be issued on order of the board to carry out the purpose for which the assessment was authorized. These warrants shall be made payable at the time or times that the board estimates that they can be paid from the proceeds of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24627.

Any outstanding registered warrants and their accrued interest may be refunded by the issuance of warrants payable at stated times fixed by the board. These warrants may be exchanged for the registered warrants or sold for not less than their par value to provide funds for the payment of the registered warrants or any of them and their accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24628.

Warrants payable at a future time or times may be issued in consideration of money loaned to the district for the purchase of any of its outstanding bonds or the refinancing or retiring of any outstanding contract. The annual interest payable on these warrants shall be less than the annual interest on the bonds purchased or contract refinanced or retired with the proceeds of the warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24628.5.

Warrants payable at a future time or times may also be issued to obtain funds or property for any lawful purpose of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

24629.

Any warrant authorized in the preceding sections of this article shall draw interest at a rate to be fixed by the board not to exceed 8 percent per year payable annually or semiannually as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

24630.

Coupons payable to bearer in a form and signed as prescribed by the board may be attached to warrants payable at a future date to evidence their interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24631.

Warrants of any district may be issued to evidence the indebtedness allowed to be incurred prior to the levy of the first district assessment, bearing interest fixed by the board at not more than 8 percent per year. These warrants shall be made payable on a date not later than the first day of July next after the first annual assessment in the district is levied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

24632.

If any district owns any property which it is authorized to lease or sell, its board may in the contract providing for the issuance of warrants payable at a future time, agree that the proceeds of the lease or sale of the property, not required by law to be used for other purposes, shall be allocated to the payment of these warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24633.

No warrants issued pursuant to this article made payable more than five years from the date of issuance shall be valid unless their issuance is authorized by a majority of the voters voting at an election called by the board for the purpose of determining whether or not the warrants shall be authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24634.

Notice of the election shall be given and the election shall be held and the result determined as nearly as practicable in the manner provided for bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24636.

All warrants issued pursuant to this article shall be sold by the board in such manner and in such quantities as may be determined by the board in its discretion, but except as otherwise expressly provided in this article, no such warrants shall be sold for less than 95 percent of the par value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration of Warrants [24650. - 24675.1.]

24650.

The provisions of this article are applicable only to the following types of warrants:

(a) Warrants made payable on demand.

(b) Warrants issued to evidence the indebtedness allowed to be incurred prior to the levy of the first district assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24651.

Whenever any warrant of a district is presented to the treasurer for payment when funds are not available for its payment, it shall thereafter draw interest at a rate determined by resolution of the board but not exceeding 8 percent per year until public notice is given that funds are available for its payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

24652.

Upon the presentation of any warrants for payment when funds are not available to pay them, the treasurer shall indorse on them all of the following:

(a) “Funds not available for payment.”

(b) Date of presentation.

(c) Rate of interest that the warrants will thereafter bear.

(d) His signature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24653.

A warrant so indorsed is a registered warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24654.

The treasurer shall keep a record showing all of the following:

(a) Number and amount of each registered warrant.

(b) Date of its issuance.

(c) Person in whose favor it was issued.

(d) Date of its presentation for payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24655.

Whenever there is sufficient money available in the treasury to pay all outstanding registered warrants or whenever the board orders all registered warrants presented for payment prior to a certain date to be paid and there is sufficient money available for the payments, the treasurer shall give notice to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24656.

The notice shall state that the treasurer is prepared to pay all registered warrants or all registered warrants presented for payment prior to the date fixed by the board.

No further description of the warrants entitled to payment need be made in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24657.

The notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the district, or if none is published in the district, in a newspaper published in any affected county, or if none is published in any affected county, the treasurer shall post the notice conspicuously at the office of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24658.

All warrants designated in the notice shall cease to draw interest at the time of the first publication or posting of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24659.

Upon the presentation of any warrant designated in the notice, the treasurer shall pay it together with the interest due on it from the date of its original presentation for payment to the date of the first publication or posting of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24660.

The treasurer shall enter all of the following in the record of registered warrants he is required to keep:

(a) Dates of the payment of the warrants.

(b) Names of the persons to whom payments are made.

(c) Amount paid to each person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24661.

No action or proceeding shall be maintained to enforce the payment of any registered warrant or to require the levy of an assessment therefor unless the action or proceeding is commenced within four years from the date of the original presentation of the warrant to the treasurer for payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24662.

A district may enter into agreement either individually or collectively with the holder or holders of any registered warrants fixing the time of, method of, and allocation of funds for the payment of the warrants and may in this agreement or otherwise waive the time of commencing any action or proceeding thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

24675.

In the case of any district described in Section 20560.1, and for purposes of financing costs of maintenance and operation on a temporary basis, repair to or replacement of damage caused by, or costs incurred as a result of, fire, flood, drought, earthquake, sabotage or acts of God, or preliminary or developmental work except for preliminary or developmental work on the Tuolumne River or its tributaries above the New Don Pedro Reservoir, in connection with works or facilities described in Section 20560.1, the district may borrow money by the issuance of notes or other evidences of indebtedness payable either from the revenue of the district or from the proceeds of sale of any authorized but unissued revenue bonds of the district, as the board may determine. Authorized but unissued revenue bonds of the district which have been approved by a vote of the electorate may only be issued for those purposes authorized by the electorate. The notes or other evidences of indebtedness shall be authorized by resolution of the board and may be issued without the necessity of calling and holding an election in the district. The notes or other evidences of indebtedness authorized under this section shall mature in not to exceed seven years from their date, may be sold either at public or private sale, and shall bear interest at such rate or rates and shall be sold at such price or prices as shall result in interest costs not exceeding such limits as may be determined by the board. The interest rates may be fixed or variable and shall not exceed 17 percent per annum. All other terms and conditions of such notes or other evidences of indebtedness shall be determined in accordance with the authorizing resolution. The notes or other evidences of indebtedness may be issued as part of a tax-exempt commercial paper program or other short-term note financing program. The district may arrange for the use of bank letters of credit or bank lines of credit for any purpose for which the notes or other evidences of indebtedness may be issued, as well as to provide additional sources of repayment for the notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued under this section. The maximum principal amount of notes or other evidences of indebtedness outstanding under this section, including the amounts drawn on available bank letters of credit or bank lines of credit, shall not at any one time exceed (1) twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) or 25 percent of the district’s annual gross revenues from the generation, transmission, distribution, and sale of electric power during its preceding fiscal year, whichever is greater, when payable from the revenues of the district; or (2) the principal amount of any authorized but unissued revenue bonds of the district, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), when payable from the proceeds of sale of such authorized but unissued revenue bonds. The notes or other evidences of indebtedness shall be legal investments for all trust funds, for the funds of all insurance companies, commercial banks, savings banks, trust companies, the state school funds, and for any funds which may be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or municipalities in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1641, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

24675.1.

Any district described in Section 20560.1 may issue notes or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Section 24675 to finance any works or facilities for the generation, transmission, distribution, or sale of electric power, except for preliminary or development work on the Tuolumne River or its tributaries above the New Don Pedro Reservoir, if bonds have already been approved prior to the issuance of the notes or evidences of indebtedness by a vote of the electorate pursuant to Section 21933 to finance the works or facilities. In no event shall the proceeds of any notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued pursuant to this section be issued for any purpose other than those authorized by the vote of the electorate, and in no event shall notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued for any purpose under this section, including bonds issued for the same purpose, exceed the amounts of bonds and notes or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by vote of the electorate for that purpose.

The limitation on outstanding notes or other evidences of indebtedness contained in Section 24675 shall not apply to notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 871, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Provisions Applicable to Bonds and Warrants [24735. - 24771.]



  ARTICLE 1. Surrender of Bonds and Warrants [24735. - 24738.]

24735.

Any owner of any bonds or warrants of a district may surrender them to the district by giving the bonds or warrants to the secretary for cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24736.

The board shall then order the bonds or warrants canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24737.

Upon the making of the order, the bonds or warrants shall cease to be an obligation of the district as of the time of their presentation to the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24738.

This article does not restrict any other method of releasing obligations of a district to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Modification of Bonds and Warrants [24760. - 24771.]

24760.

If a district desires to extend the time or times of maturity of any or all of its bonds or warrants payable at stated times or to reduce the rate of interest thereon or to effect any combination of these, it may either:

(a) Enter into an agreement in writing with the holders of the bonds or warrants affected, specifying the changes in dates of maturity, rate or rates of interest, or both.

(b) Propose a plan of composition of its outstanding indebtedness which involves changes in dates of maturity, rate or rates of interest, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24761.

The rate of interest specified in the agreement or plan shall not exceed 8 percent per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

24762.

All interest coupons shall be payable on the first day of January or the first day of July.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24765.

The board may call an election to submit to the voters the question whether or not the bonds or warrants shall be modified as provided in the agreement or plan. Notice of the election shall be given and it shall be held and its result declared as nearly as practicable as in the case of bond elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24766.

If a majority of the votes cast for and against the proposal is in favor of modifying the bonds or warrants, the proposal is approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24767.

An agreement or plan may not be carried out pursuant to this article until a proposal therefor is approved by the voters, and a plan may not be carried out until it is either:

(a) Agreed to in writing by all of the holders of bonds and warrants affected.

(b) Confirmed in accordance with federal bankruptcy law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 94, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

24768.

Upon the presentation to the secretary of any of the bonds or warrants covered by the agreement or plan, he shall indorse on them the date to which their maturity is extended and shall attach to them coupons with his signature or a facsimile of it to evidence the semiannual interest from the time or times of the original maturity of the bonds or warrants to the new maturity date or dates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24769.

If the agreement or plan provides for a reduction in the rate of interest on the bonds or warrants before the original time or times of their maturity, new coupons shall be attached to the bonds or warrants to evidence the reduced interest. Any old coupons evidencing the interest originally provided shall be detached by the secretary from the bonds or warrants and canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24770.

Each bond or warrant presented and indorsed shall continue as an obligation of the district and shall not become due until the date specified in the agreement or plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24771.

This article does not amend, modify, or limit any other provision of law for changing the date or dates of maturity of outstanding obligations of a district, but provides an alternative method of extending any obligations whose date or dates of maturity may be changed under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. BONDS [24950. - 25402.]



  CHAPTER 1. Construction Bonds [24950. - 24963.]

24950.

Construction bonds may be authorized for the purposes of acquiring necessary irrigation, drainage, and power development and distribution works, acquiring the necessary property for these works, acquiring any property necessary for the purposes of the district, and otherwise carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24951.

The board shall at any of the following times estimate the amount of money it is necessary to raise for the purposes for which construction bonds may be issued:

(a) As soon after the district has been formed as may be practicable.

(b) Whenever the board finds that the construction fund raised by the next preceding bond issue is insufficient or has been exhausted by expenditures therefrom and it is necessary to raise additional money for the purposes for which construction bonds may be authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24952.

The board shall cause any surveys, examinations, and drawings, to be made which will furnish the proper basis for making an estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24953.

The surveys, examinations, and drawings shall be made under the direction of a competent engineer and shall be certified by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24954.

The surveys, examinations, drawings, and estimate may provide that the works necessary for a completed project shall be constructed progressively during a period of years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24955.

The estimate may include a sum sufficient to pay the interest on the proposed construction bonds for four years or less and, if the bonds are to be payable solely from revenues, the estimate may also include a sum for a revenue bond reserve fund to be set aside out of the proceeds of sale of revenue bonds to be maintained by revenues and used and withdrawn solely for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on such bonds in the event that no other funds are available therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 298.)
-------------------------------------------

24955.1.

In the case of any district described in Section 20560.2 with respect to construction bonds issued for purposes of financing the works described in that section, the estimate may also include a sum sufficient to pay the interest on the proposed construction bonds for 10 years or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24956.

The estimate shall include the estimated cost of inspection required by law of works in course of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

24963.

The board, if it declares by resolution that the proposed plan of the project is satisfactory and that the plan is feasible, shall adopt an order determining the amount of bonds that should be issued to raise the money necessary to complete the proposed project. Construction bonds in an amount fixed in the order determining the amount in which they should be issued shall not be issued unless their issuance is authorized at a bond election, and the bonds in the amount fixed shall be issued when their issuance is authorized at a bond election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Refunding Bonds [25035. - 25119.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Refunding Provisions [25035. - 25041.]

25035.

Any district may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any or all of the outstanding bonds and warrants of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 684.)
-------------------------------------------

25035.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division requiring any election, any district described in Section 20560.1 may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any or all of the outstanding bonds of the district, even if the principal amount of the refunding bonds is greater than the principal amount of the bonds being refunded, without the necessity of calling and holding an election in the district if the issuance of the refunding bonds results in a reduction in the total remaining interest and principal payments on bonds of the district. In no event shall the proceeds of any refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section be used for purposes other than to refund outstanding bonds of the district or for purposes other than those for which the refunded bonds were authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 871, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

25038.

The board shall call an election for the purpose of authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

25039.

Notice of the election shall be given and it shall be held and its result determined and declared substantially in the manner provided for a bond election, except that a majority vote only is required for the authorization of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25040.

Any issue of refunding bonds may in the discretion of the board mature serially or at one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25041.

The maturities of refunding bonds shall be fixed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Refunding Bond Sinking Fund [25060. - 25068.]

25060.

If any issue of refunding bonds are made to mature at one time, the board prior to or at the time of their issuance shall provide for the creation of and payments into a sinking fund for the payment of the bonds in amounts determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

25061.

The amount of sinking fund payments may be modified from time to time by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

25062.

Whenever the sinking fund contains at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the board may publish notice of redemption at least once a week for three successive weeks in some newspaper published in the office county and may publish it in any other newspaper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

25063.

The notice shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The amount available for the redemption of the bonds.
